Washington statutes.
RCW 41.54.100

Transfer of membership under chapter 341, Laws of 1998—Benefits not diminished.

Persons who were members of the public employees' retirement system plan 2 prior to September 1, 2000, and were transferred or mandated into membership pursuant to chapter 341, Laws of 1998 shall suffer no diminution of benefits guaranteed to public employees' retirement system plan 2 members as of the date of their change in membership.

[ 1998 c 341 s 705.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1998 c 341: See RCW 41.35.901.